Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201717-222
Village situated in more than one county; jails.

Any village situated in two or more counties may use the jails of any and all counties in which any part of such village is situated.

Laws 1893, c. 9, § 4, p. 139;

R.S.1913, § 5072;

C.S.1922, § 4244;

C.S.1929, § 17-222;

R.S.1943, § 17-222;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 88.
August 24, 2017